South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Natural Resources, relating to Individual Antlerless Deer Tags, Antlerless Deer Limits for Private Lands in Game Zones 1-4, and Youth Deer Hunting Day, designated as Regulation Document Number 5260, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Department of Natural Resources is proposing to amend the existing regulations antlerless deer limits for private lands in Game Zone 2. The following is a section-by-section summary of the proposed changes and additions: The Notice of Drafting was published in Volume 47, Issue No. 10 of the State Register on October 27, 2023. ----XX----